Washington statutes.
RCW 36.86.070

Classification of roads in accordance with designations under federal functional classification system.

From time to time the legislative authority of each county shall classify and designate as the county primary road system such county roads as are designated rural minor collector, rural major collector, rural minor arterial, rural principal arterial, urban collector, urban minor arterial, and urban principal arterial in the federal functional classification system.

[ 1982 c 145 s 2; 1963 c 4 s 36.86.070. Prior: 1949 c 165 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6450-8h.]